Hawaii statutes.
§804-2 Unclaimed bail money. All money
deposited by way of bail or bond, in any proceeding before any court, that has
not been declared forfeited, and not claimed within two years after the final
disposition of the cause of action in which the money was deposited, shall be
presumed abandoned under chapter 523A. [L 1929, c 138, §1; RL 1935, §5431; RL
1945, §10732; am L 1949, c 323, §1; RL 1955, §256-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14;
am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §709-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 87,
§1]

Note

L 2006, c 87, §2 provides:

"SECTION 2. This Act [approved May 10, 2006] shall
apply to all bail money held at the time of its enactment, or at any time
thereafter."

Case Notes

Cited: 36 H. 188, 193 (1942).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next